Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 13

Tennessee Equine Health Advisory Commission

43-13-101. Purpose and intent.

In the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, it is the purpose and intent of this chapter to authorize the commission to study and make recommendations on issues related to equine health in this state to:

Promote the health of horses in this state; and

Encourage agriculture and the breeding of equine livestock in this state.

Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§ 43-13-101 — 43-13-105, concerning anhydrous ammonia was transferred to ch. 11, part 3 of this title in 1987.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 3. July 15, 2020.

43-13-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commission” means the Tennessee equine health advisory commission, created by § 43-13-103; and

“Department” means the department of agriculture.

Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 3. July 15, 2020.

43-13-103. Tennessee equine health advisory commission.

There is created a Tennessee equine health advisory commission, which consists of nine (9) members as follows:

The commissioner of agriculture, or the commissioner's designee, as an ex officio voting member;

One (1) member appointed by the governor who is licensed to practice veterinary medicine under title 63, chapter 12, part 1, who has experience in the equine industry in this state, to be chosen from a list of eligible nominees from the Tennessee Veterinary Medical Association;

One (1) public member appointed by the speaker of the senate;

One (1) public member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

Five (5) public members appointed by the governor.

Of the members appointed under subdivision (a)(5), the governor shall strive to appoint members from each grand division of this state.

The governor shall appoint initial members of the commission to staggered terms as follows:

The veterinarian appointed under subdivision (a)(2), the public member appointed under subdivision (a)(3), the public member appointed under subdivision (a)(4), and one (1) of the members appointed under subdivision (a)(5) are appointed to serve initial terms of six (6) years; and

Four (4) of the members appointed under subdivision (a)(5) are appointed to serve initial terms of four (4) years.

The terms of initial appointees to the commission commence on August 1, 2020. All subsequent appointments are for four-year terms that begin on July 1 and end on June 30.

The commission is attached to the department of agriculture for administrative purposes.

Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Tennessee equine health advisory commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 3. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

43-13-104. Eligibility for membership on commission.

To be eligible for appointment to, and membership on, the commission, a person must:

Be a legal resident of this state at the time of appointment; and

Have personal or professional experience in and knowledge of the equine industry in this state.

Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 3. July 15, 2020.

43-13-105. Meetings — Quorum — Service without compensation or travel expenses.

The commission shall meet at least once per year and may hold additional meetings necessary for the purpose of transacting business that properly comes before it. All members of the commission must be duly notified of the time and place of each meeting.

The commissioner of agriculture, or the commissioner's designee, shall call the initial meeting of the commission. The members of the commission shall elect a chair and a secretary during the initial meeting. The chair of the commission shall call all subsequent commission meetings.

A simple majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business or the exercise of its powers.

The members of the commission serve without compensation or travel expenses.

Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 3. July 15, 2020.

43-13-106. Study of equine health and equine industry issues — Regulatory and legislative recommendations —
Report.

The commission shall study the state of equine health in this state, emerging equine health issues that may impact the equine industry in this state, and other equine health and equine industry issues the commission deems relevant, and shall make regulatory and legislative recommendations to the department and the general assembly.

On or before February 1, 2021, and not later than each February 1 thereafter, the commission shall develop and submit an annual report to the governor, the commissioner of agriculture, the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate, and the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives. The report must describe the status of equine health in this state, make any recommendations for rulemaking to the department that the commission considers appropriate, and make any legislative recommendations to the general assembly that the commission considers appropriate.

Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 808, § 3. July 15, 2020.